Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.077

Applications—Processing of recyclable materials—Department of ecology notice.

(1) When the board receives an application from a political subdivision that includes a request for assistance in financing the cost of public facilities to encourage the development of a private facility to process recyclable materials, a copy of the application shall be sent by the board to the department of ecology.

(2) The board shall notify the department of ecology of its decision regarding any application made under this section.

[ 1993 c 320 s 6; 1989 c 431 s 63.]